test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-uasi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - uási: # i-stems
    uási+N+Sg+Nom: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Gen: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Acc: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Ill: uáisán
    uási+N+Sg+Loc: uásist
    uási+N+Sg+Com: ossijn
    uási+N+Sg+Abe: uásittáá
    uási+N+Ess: uássin
    uási+N+Par: uássid
    uási+N+Pl+Nom: uásih
    uási+N+Pl+Gen: oosij
    uási+N+Pl+Acc: oosijd
    uási+N+Pl+Ill: ossijd
    uási+N+Pl+Loc: oosijn
    uási+N+Pl+Com: osijguin
    uási+N+Pl+Abe: osijttáá
